Washington statutes.
RCW 4.20.005

Wrongful death—Application of terms.

Words in RCW 4.20.010, 4.20.020, and 4.20.030 denoting the singular shall be understood as belonging to a plurality of persons or things. The masculine shall apply also to the feminine, and the word person shall also apply to bodies politic and corporate.

[ 1917 c 123 s 3; RRS s 183-2. Formerly RCW 4.20.010, part.]